Massachusetts, session 194th, H2128.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 150 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- An employer shall not
be subject to any liability or punishment for or on account of its failure to pay for work on a
Sunday or a recognized holiday under sections 6, 13 or 16 of chapter 136, if the employer pleads
and proves by a preponderance of the evidence that it acted in good faith in conformity with a
written opinion letter of the department or of an agency of the commonwealth which has or had
at the time the authority to administer or interpret said law. Such a defense, if established, shall
be a bar to the action if the administrative interpretation was in effect at the time of the violation,
even if it is later modified, rescinded, or determined by judicial authority to be invalid or of no
of 2

legal effect. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "employer" shall extend to the persons
described in the sixth paragraph of section 148.
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 1B of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence, the following two sentences:- An
employer or the officer or agent of any domestic or foreign corporation shall not be subject to
any liability or punishment for or on account of its failure to pay overtime compensation in
violation of this section if the employer or the officer or agent of any such corporation pleads and
proves by a preponderance of the evidence that it acted in good faith in conformity with a written
opinion letter of the department or of an agency of the commonwealth which has or had at the
time the authority to administer or interpret said law. Such a defense, if established, shall be a bar
to the action if the administrative interpretation was in effect at the time of the violation, even if
it is later modified, rescinded, or determined by judicial authority to be invalid or of no legal
effect.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 shall be effective for all causes of action accruing before,
on, or after the date of enactment, including any cause of action now pending.
of 2